Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.806

Applicable fees, charges, and penalties.

Limited liability companies are subject to the applicable fees, charges, and penalties established by the secretary of state under RCW 23.95.260 and 43.07.120.

[ 2015 c 176 s 7132; 2015 c 188 s 102.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.